Utah statutes.
63A-14-704.   Subpoena powers.

(1)  For all proceedings authorized by this chapter, the commission may issue a subpoena to:

(a)  require the attendance of a witness; or

(b)  direct the production of evidence.

(2)  The commission shall issue a subpoena under this section:

(a)  as required under Section 63A-14-706;

(b)  at the direction of the chair, if the chair determines that the testimony or evidence is relevant to the review of a complaint; or

(c)  upon a vote of a majority of the commission members.



Enacted by Chapter 426, 2013 General Session

